Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5690.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 155. (1) The If an owner of any land in the drainage district or any a city, township, village, district or county having control of any highway which may feel in the drainage district is aggrieved by the apportionment of benefits so made by the commissioner, under section 154(10), the owner may, within 10 60 days after the day of review of such the apportionments, appeal therefrom and for such purpose make an application apply to the probate court of the proper county for the appointment of a board of review. , The application must be made by concurrently filing with said probate the court a notice of appeal and at the same time filing with said court a bond in such sum as the amount required by the judge of probate. may require, with The bond must have 1 or more sureties to be approved by the judge of probate , and be conditioned upon on the payment of all costs in case if the apportionment made by the commissioner shall be is sustained. Such (2) An appeal may be taken by the board of county or district road commissioners in on behalf of the a county. , An appeal may be taken by the mayor of any city in on behalf of the a city, by the supervisor in on behalf of any a township, or by the village president of any village in on behalf of the a village when authorized by the village or city council, township board or road commission, respectively.legislative body of the city, township, or village, respectively. (3) Only 1 board shall be appointed by such the probate court.